Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 506, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 506. There is hereby created the position of Director
of the Department of Corrections. The Director shall be qualified
for such position by character, knowledge, skill, ability,
education, training and successful administrative experience and
shall either be certified as a peace officer in this state by the
Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training, or shall have
five (5) ten (10) years of professional level corrections work. The
Director of Corrections shall be appointed by the Governor with the
advice and consent of the Senate and shall serve at the pleasure of
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3115 Page 1

the Governor and may be removed or replaced without cause for a term
of five (5) years. The Director may serve more than one term and
may be reappointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of
the Senate. Compensation for the Director shall be determined by
the Governor. The Director may be removed from office by a two-
thirds (2/3) vote of the members elected to and constituting each
chamber of the Legislature.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate








ENGR. H. B. NO. 3115 Page 2